dev/adjective/adjective.ne.dix
  <!-- चतुर; चतुर; 1 -->
    <pardef n="चतुर__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ा</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- निम्न; निम्न; 4 -->
    <pardef n="निम्न__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>तम</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>तर</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- गत; गत; 1 -->
    <pardef n="गत__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- नूनिलो; नूनिलो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="नूनिलो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- पल्लो; पल्लो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="पल्लो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- छिटो-छिटो; छिटो-छिटो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="छिटो-छिटो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- उपलब्ध; उपलब्ध; 1 -->
    <pardef n="उपलब्ध__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- पक्की; पक्की; 1 -->
    <pardef n="पक्की__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- रमाईलो; रमाईलो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="रमाईलो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- समाप्त; समाप्त; 1 -->
    <pardef n="समाप्त__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- व्यापक; व्यापक; 1 -->
    <pardef n="व्यापक__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ग्रामिण; ग्राम; 1 -->
    <pardef n="ग्राम/िण__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ीण</l>
          <r>िण<s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- दक्षिण; दक्षिण; 1 -->
    <pardef n="दक्षिण__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- निजी; निजी; 1 -->
    <pardef n="निजी__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- चिप्लो; चिप्लो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="चिप्लो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- रसीलो; रसील; 1 -->
    <pardef n="रसील/ो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ा</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- चिल्लो; चिल्ल; 2 -->
    <pardef n="चिल्ल/ो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ो</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ा</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- उल्टो; उल्ट; 2 -->
    <pardef n="उल्ट/ो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ो</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ा</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- मेसो; मेसो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="मेसो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- अब्धो; अ; 1 -->
    <pardef n="अ/ब्धो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>न्धा</l>
          <r>ब्धो<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- गम्भीर; गम्भीर; 1 -->
    <pardef n="गम्भीर__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- प्राचिन; प्राच; 1 -->
    <pardef n="प्राच/िन__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ीन</l>
          <r>िन<s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- घुमाउरो; घुमाउरो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="घुमाउरो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- टाठो; टाठ; 1 -->
    <pardef n="टाठ/ो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ा</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- साङ्लो; साङ्लो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="साङ्लो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ठूलो-बडा; ठूल; 1 -->
    <pardef n="ठूल/ो-बडा__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ा-बडा</l>
          <r>ो-बडा<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- रुसो; रुसो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="रुसो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- तीतो; तीत; 2 -->
    <pardef n="तीत/ो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ो</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ा</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- बाठो; बाठ; 2 -->
    <pardef n="बाठ/ो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ो</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ा</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- नखरमाउलो; नखरमाउल; 1 -->
    <pardef n="नखरमाउल/ो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ी</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ठिटो; ठिटो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="ठिटो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- छुच्चो; छुच्च; 1 -->
    <pardef n="छुच्च/ो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ी</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- उस्तो; उस्तो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="उस्तो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- कमजोर; कमजोर; 1 -->
    <pardef n="कमजोर__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- प्रमुख; प्रमुख; 1 -->
    <pardef n="प्रमुख__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- अमेरिका; अमेरिक; 1 -->
    <pardef n="अमेरिक/ा__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ी</l>
          <r>ा<s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- लाटो; लाट; 2 -->
    <pardef n="लाट/ो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ो</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ा</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- मानसिक; मानसिक; 1 -->
    <pardef n="मानसिक__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ढुंग्रो; ढुंग्रो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="ढुंग्रो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- बाँकी; बाँकी; 1 -->
    <pardef n="बाँकी__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="चतुर"><i>चतुर</i><par n="चतुर__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="निम्न"><i>निम्न</i><par n="निम्न__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="गत"><i>गत</i><par n="गत__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="नूनिलो"><i>नूनिलो</i><par n="नूनिलो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="पल्लो"><i>पल्लो</i><par n="पल्लो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="छिटो-छिटो"><i>छिटो-छिटो</i><par n="छिटो-छिटो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="उपलब्ध"><i>उपलब्ध</i><par n="उपलब्ध__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="पक्की"><i>पक्की</i><par n="पक्की__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="रमाईलो"><i>रमाईलो</i><par n="रमाईलो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="समाप्त"><i>समाप्त</i><par n="समाप्त__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="व्यापक"><i>व्यापक</i><par n="व्यापक__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ग्रामिण"><i>ग्राम</i><par n="ग्राम/िण__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="दक्षिण"><i>दक्षिण</i><par n="दक्षिण__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="निजी"><i>निजी</i><par n="निजी__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="चिप्लो"><i>चिप्लो</i><par n="चिप्लो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="रसीलो"><i>रसील</i><par n="रसील/ो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="चिल्लो"><i>चिल्ल</i><par n="चिल्ल/ो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="उल्टो"><i>उल्ट</i><par n="उल्ट/ो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="मेसो"><i>मेसो</i><par n="मेसो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="अब्धो"><i>अ</i><par n="अ/ब्धो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="गम्भीर"><i>गम्भीर</i><par n="गम्भीर__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="प्राचिन"><i>प्राच</i><par n="प्राच/िन__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="घुमाउरो"><i>घुमाउरो</i><par n="घुमाउरो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="टाठो"><i>टाठ</i><par n="टाठ/ो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="साङ्लो"><i>साङ्लो</i><par n="साङ्लो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ठूलो-बडा"><i>ठूल</i><par n="ठूल/ो-बडा__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="रुसो"><i>रुसो</i><par n="रुसो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="तीतो"><i>तीत</i><par n="तीत/ो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="बाठो"><i>बाठ</i><par n="बाठ/ो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="नखरमाउलो"><i>नखरमाउल</i><par n="नखरमाउल/ो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ठिटो"><i>ठिटो</i><par n="ठिटो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="छुच्चो"><i>छुच्च</i><par n="छुच्च/ो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="उस्तो"><i>उस्तो</i><par n="उस्तो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="कमजोर"><i>कमजोर</i><par n="कमजोर__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="प्रमुख"><i>प्रमुख</i><par n="प्रमुख__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="अमेरिका"><i>अमेरिक</i><par n="अमेरिक/ा__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="लाटो"><i>लाट</i><par n="लाट/ो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="मानसिक"><i>मानसिक</i><par n="मानसिक__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ढुंग्रो"><i>ढुंग्रो</i><par n="ढुंग्रो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="बाँकी"><i>बाँकी</i><par n="बाँकी__adj"/></e>
